Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3815
Agriculture promotion
and development program; established; purposes; employment of specialists;
advisory committee.

The Department of Agriculture
shall establish an agriculture promotion and development program. The department
shall employ a program director and one specialist in research techniques
and market development. Both individuals shall report directly to the Director
of Agriculture.

The program shall concentrate on the identification and development
of opportunities to enhance profitability in agriculture and to stimulate
agriculture-related economic development. Program activities may include,
but not be limited to, (1) promotion and market development, (2) value-added
processing of alternative and traditional commodities, (3) agricultural diversification,
including poultry development and aquaculture, (4) agricultural cooperatives,
and (5) alternative crops.

In order to carry out the purposes of this section, the program
director may, if he or she deems necessary, convene an advisory committee
to assist the program director in developing and implementing program activities.
Representatives from the Nebraska Food Processing Center, the Cooperative
Extension Service of the University of Nebraska, the commodity boards, the
Department of Economic Development, the United States Department of Agriculture
grant programs, and the private sector may serve on such committee at the
request of the program director. If an advisory committee is convened, committee
members shall not receive any reimbursement for expenses.

The Department of Agriculture shall serve as the facilitator,
coordinator, and catalyst for developments through and with the Nebraska Food
Processing Center, the Cooperative Extension Service of the University of
Nebraska, the commodity boards, the Department of Economic Development, other
state agencies, the United States Department of Agriculture grant programs,
and the private sector. It is the intent of the Legislature that the department
foster close working relationships between production agriculture and existing
programs for the purposes of agricultural development and promotion. The department
may enter into such contracts as may be necessary to carry out the purposes
of this section.

For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise
requires, private sector shall include, but not be limited to, representatives
of food industry associations, lenders, or venture capital groups.

Laws 1987, LB 561, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 2-2516;

Laws 2011, LB334, § 1.